Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2697.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 15, subdivision 16, is amended to read: Subd. 16. Western Lake Superior Sanitary District; Clarifiers 17,500,000 For a grant to the Western Lake Superior Sanitary District to design, construct, and rehabilitate four secondary clarifiers in the district's wastewater treatment system.new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642, the bond sale authorization and appropriation of bond proceeds for the project in this subdivision are available until December 31, 2029.new text end